New York, session 2025-2026, A8230.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 112 of the correction law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 7 to read as follows: 3 7. The commissioner shall establish procedures to allow an incarcerat- 4 ed individual in a correctional facility which has suspended visiting 5 privileges to have private meetings with their legal counsel. Such 6 private meetings may be held in-person, via telephone, or electron- 7 ically. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11113-02-5